test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UU_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k'ajúu - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UU_STEM_1

     k'ajúu+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k'ajúu
     k'ajúu+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k'ajúuga
     k'ajúu+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu
     k'ajúu+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúugang
     k'ajúu+V+DIRECT+PAST: k'ajúugan
     k'ajúu+V+RELATIVE: k'ajúus
     k'ajúu+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k'ajúugang
     k'ajúu+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k'ajúuganggang
     k'ajúu+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúugangang
     k'ajúu+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúugiinii
     k'ajúu+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúugaangaa
     k'ajúu+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúugaangaan
     k'ajúu+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k'ajúuäsaa
     k'ajúu+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k'ajúuäs
     k'ajúu+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k'ajúuäsaang
     k'ajúu+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k'ajúuäsga
     k'ajúu+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k'ajúuäsaas
     k'ajúu+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúuäsaa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'uuj
     k'ajúu+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'uujang
     k'ajúu+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k'ajúuäsaa'uujang
     k'ajúu+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'us
     k'ajúu+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k'ajúu'ujaa
     k'ajúu+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'uujaangaa
     k'ajúu+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k'ajúuäsaa'us
     k'ajúu+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ahlanggang
     k'ajúu+V+CERTAIN+PAST: k'ajúu'ahlanggan
     k'ajúu+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'ahlanggiinii
     k'ajúu+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k'ajúuäsaa'ahlans
     k'ajúu+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k'ajúuäseehl
     k'ajúu+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k'ajúu'uu
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'waa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'waa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'waang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k'ajúu'wägan
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k'ajúu'aawaa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k'ajúu'aawaan
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k'ajúu'waas
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k'ajúu'aawaas
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúu'waa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúu'aawaa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k'ajúugang'waa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k'ajúugang'waang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúugang'waa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'wägiinii
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'wägaangaa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'wägaangaan
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k'ajúu'waaäsaa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k'ajúu'waaäs
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waaäsaang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waaäsga
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waaäsaas
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúu'waaäsaa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'waa'uuj
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'waa'uujang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k'ajúu'waaäsaa'uujang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'waa'us
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k'ajúu'waa'ujaa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'waa'uujaangaa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waaäsaa'us
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k'ajúu'waa'ahlanggang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k'ajúu'waa'ahlanggan
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k'ajúu'waa'ahlans
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k'ajúu'aawaa'ahlang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k'ajúu'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k'ajúu'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k'ajúu'waa'ahl
     k'ajúu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k'ajúu'waaäseehl
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k'ajúu'ang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'angga
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'anggang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: k'ajúu'anggan
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k'ajúu'aangaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: k'ajúu'aangaan
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: k'ajúu'ans
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k'ajúu'aangaas
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúu'angang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúu'aangaa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'anggang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k'ajúugang'anggang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúugang'angang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'anggiinii
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'anggaangaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'anggaangaan
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k'ajúu'angäsaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k'ajúu'angäs
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'angäsaang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'angäsga
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'angäsaas
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúu'angäsaa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'uuj
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'uujang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k'ajúu'angäsaa'uujang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'us
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k'ajúu'ang'ujaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'ang'uujaangaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'angäsaa'us
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k'ajúu'aang'ahlanggang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: k'ajúu'aang'ahlanggan
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'aang'ahlanggiinii
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k'ajúu'angäsaa'ahlans
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k'ajúu'aang'ahlans
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: k'ajúu'aangaa'ahlang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k'ajúu'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k'ajúu'aangaa'ahlanggang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: k'ajúu'aang'ahl
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k'ajúu'angäseehl
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k'ajúu'ang'uu
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'waa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'waa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'waang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k'ajúu'ang'wägan
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k'ajúu'ang'aawaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k'ajúu'ang'aawaan
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k'ajúu'ang'waas
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k'ajúu'ang'aawaas
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúu'ang'waa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúu'ang'aawaa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k'ajúugang'ang'waa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k'ajúugang'ang'waang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúugang'ang'waa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'ang'wägiinii
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'ang'wägaangaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'ang'wägaangaan
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k'ajúu'ang'waaäsaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k'ajúu'ang'waaäs
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'ang'waaäsaang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'ang'waaäsga
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'ang'waaäsaas
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajúu'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k'ajúu'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'waa'uuj
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'waa'uujang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k'ajúu'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'waa'us
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k'ajúu'ang'waa'ujaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k'ajúu'ang'waaäsaa'us
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k'ajúu'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k'ajúu'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k'ajúu'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k'ajúu'ang'waa'ahlans
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k'ajúu'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k'ajúu'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k'ajúu'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k'ajúu'ang'waa'ahl
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k'ajúu'ang'waaäseehl
